Wyoming, session 2026, SF0082.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 17-28-107(a)(v) by creating a new
subparagraph (D) is amended to read:

17-28-107. Duties of the registered agent; duties of
the entity.

(a) The registered agent shall:
SF0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0324

(v) Maintain at the registered office, the
following information for each domestic entity represented
which shall be current within sixty (60) days of any change
until the entity's first annual report is accepted for
filing with the secretary of state and thereafter when the
annual report is due for filing and shall be maintained in
a format that can be reasonably produced on demand:

(D) The names and addresses of each
domestic entity's owners including but not limited to
partners, members and shareholders, unless the entity meets
one (1) of the following:

(I) Has more than one hundred (100)
owners;

(II) Maintains a fixed, physical
business location within this state that serves as the
entity's principal place of business and is used by the
entity for the entity's ordinary business operations;

SF0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0324
(III) Is a decentralized autonomous
organization as defined by W.S. 17-31-102(a)(ii); or

(IV) Is a decentralized unincorporated
nonprofit association as defined by W.S. 17-32-102(a)(iii).

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0082